Massachusetts, session 194th, H5137.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 140 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 141D the following section: -
Section 141E. (a) For purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Animal rescue organization”, a non-profit organization engaged in the rescue and
placement of animals that: (i) is registered with the department of agriculture; (ii) does not breed
animals and is not located on the same premises as any person or entity that breeds animals; and
(iii) does not obtain animals in exchange for payment or compensation from a person or entity
that breeds or brokers animals.
“Parrot”, a bird belonging to the order Psittaciformes.
(b) No person shall sell, offer to sell, exchange, trade, barter, lease or transfer for
permanent physical placement a parrot. A person may surrender or otherwise transfer for
of 2

permanent physical placement without compensation a parrot to: (i) an animal rescue
organization; or (ii) a public animal control facility or shelter. An animal rescue organization or a
public animal control facility or shelter may transfer a parrot to an individual for permanent
physical placement without compensation.
(c) A violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000. Each
parrot sold, exchanged, traded, bartered, leased or transferred for permanent physical placement
in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.
(d) A city or town shall enforce this section through its animal control officers or police
officers in a manner consistent with the disposition provisions in section 21D of chapter 40.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 180 days following its passage.
of 2